Arkansas, session 2025, HB1092.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Department of Human Services - Division of Provider Services and
Quality Assurance for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N249N DHS DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
(2) L005N PSYCHIATRIC SPECIALIST 1 GRADE MP08
(3) L013N GENERAL PHYSICIAN 1 GRADE MP06
*LCW003*
03-18-2025 16:35:30 LCW003

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1092
(4) L009C NURSE MANAGER 3 GRADE MP03
(5) L021N PHYSICAL THERAPIST 1 GRADE MP03
(6) L020C NURSING SERVICES UNIT MANAGER 1 GRADE MP02
(7) L019C REGISTERED NURSE COORDINATOR 3 GRADE MP02
(8) L027C REGISTERED NURSE SUPERVISOR 9 GRADE MP02
(9) L038C REGISTERED NURSE 49 GRADE MP01
(10) D063C COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE IT05
(11) N080N DHS/DMS ASSISTANT DIRECTOR - FISCAL 1 GRADE GS14
(12) N112N DHS ASST DEP DIR FIN SUPPORT SYSTEM 1 GRADE GS13
(13) G056C DHS/DCC ASST DIR OPS & PROG SUPV 1 GRADE GS13
(14) A016C DHS DMS BUSINESS OPERATIONS MANAGER 2 GRADE GS12
(15) N167N DHS POLICY & RESEARCH DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS12
(16) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
(17) G027N DHS RESEARCH ANALYSIS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(18) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(19) L010C DHS DMS MEDICAL ASSISTANCE MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(20) G099C DHS PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR 4 GRADE GS09
(21) X038C QUALITY ASSURANCE MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(22) G152C DHS PROGRAM MANAGER 9 GRADE GS08
(23) X067C HEALTH FACILITIES SURVEYOR 22 GRADE GS08
(24) X062C QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS08
(25) E023C TRAINING PROJECT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(26) G183C DHS PROGRAM COORDINATOR 9 GRADE GS07
(27) G153C DHS/DAAS PROGRAM SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(28) M039C MEDICAID SERVICES SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(29) M023C SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM COORD 1 GRADE GS07
(30) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 5 GRADE GS06
(31) M053C CHILD CARE SERVICE SPECIALIST 11 GRADE GS06
(32) G210C DHS PROGRAM SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS06
(33) G198C DHS/DAAS PROGRAM SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS06
(34) M051C FAMILY SERVICE WORKER 5 GRADE GS06
(35) G180C GRANTS ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(36) B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(37) X094C SERVICES & PROGRAM LICENSING SPECIALIST 7 GRADE GS06
(38) C050C ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS05
(39) L070C HEALTH CARE ANALYST 3 GRADE GS05
03-18-2025 16:35:30 LCW003

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1092
(40) X124C HEALTH FACILITY REVIEWER 1 GRADE GS05
(41) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 10 GRADE GS04
(42) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 4 GRADE GS03
(43) C087C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST I 1 GRADE GS02
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 186

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Department of Human Services - Division of Provider Services and Quality
Assurance for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from
funds appropriated herein for such purposes: eight (8) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the paying account as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Human Services - Division of
Provider Services and Quality Assurance for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $10,948,892
(02) EXTRA HELP 67,657
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 4,044,437
(04) OVERTIME 2,909
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 3,641,250
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 25,000
(C) PROF. FEES 703,675
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $19,433,820

03-18-2025 16:35:30 LCW003

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1092
SECTION 4. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 5. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 6. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee




03-18-2025 16:35:30 LCW003